South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-80. (A) A person who knowingly and unlawfully delivers, dispenses, or otherwise provides fentanyl or a fentanyl-related substance as defined in Section 44-53-190(B) and Section 44-53-210(c)(6) to another person, in violation of the provisions of Section 44-53-370, commits the felony offense of fentanyl-induced homicide if the proximate cause of the death of any other person is the injection, inhalation, absorption, or ingestion of any amount of the fentanyl or fentanyl-related substance that was unlawfully delivered, dispensed, or otherwise provided. (B) A person convicted of a fentanyl-induced homicide pursuant to the provisions of this section must be imprisoned not more than thirty years. (C) It is not a defense pursuant to this section that a decedent contributed to his own death by his purposeful, knowing, reckless, or negligent injection, inhalation, absorption, or ingestion of the controlled substance or by his consenting to the administration of the controlled substance by another person, unless there exists clear and convincing evidence that the decedent intended to commit suicide. This section does not prohibit a person from being arrested, charged, or prosecuted for any other applicable offense, whether or not the offense arises from the same circumstances as provided in this section. (D) A person who knowingly injects, inhales, absorbs, or ingests any amount of fentanyl along with another consenting person, which is the proximate cause of the death of the consenting person, shall not be prosecuted under this section. SECTION 2.  Section 16-1-10(D) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding a new offense to read: Section 16-3-80. Fentanyl-induced homicide SECTION 3.  The repeal or amendment by this act of any law, whether temporary or permanent or civil or criminal, does not affect pending actions, rights, duties, or liabilities founded thereon, or alter, discharge, release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred under the repealed or amended law, unless the repealed or amended provision shall so expressly provide.  After the effective date of this act, all laws repealed or amended by this act must be taken and treated as remaining in full force and effect for the purpose of sustaining any pending or vested right, civil action, special proceeding, criminal prosecution, or appeal existing as of the effective date of this act, and for the enforcement of rights, duties, penalties, forfeitures, and liabilities as they stood under the repealed or amended laws. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. /s/Sen. Hembree                                                   /s/Rep. Johnson /s/Sen. Sabb                                                          /s/Rep. Robbins /s/Sen. Adams                                                      /s/Rep. Rose On Part of the Senate                                            On Part of the House ----XX----